Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-502.02
Sexually transmitted diseases; rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as shall, in its judgment, be necessary to control and suppress sexually transmitted diseases.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. XVII, § 2, p. 802;

C.S.1922, § 8299;

C.S.1929, § 71-2902;

R.S.1943, § 71-1102;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 71-1102;

Laws 1988, LB 1012, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 490;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 378.